test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_vuaru_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


Tests:

  
  Noun - vuáru: # not checked
    vuáru+v2+N+Sg+Nom: vuáṛu
    vuáru+v2+N+Sg+Gen: vuáˊro
    vuáru+v2+N+Sg+Acc: vuáˊro
    vuáru+v2+N+Sg+Ill: vuáṛun
    vuáru+v2+N+Sg+Loc: vuáˊroost
    vuáru+v2+N+Sg+Com: vuáˊroin
    vuáru+v2+N+Sg+Abe: vuáˊrottáá
    vuáru+v2+N+Ess: vuárrun
    vuáru+v2+N+Par: vuárrud
    vuáru+v2+N+Pl+Nom: vuáˊroh
    vuáru+v2+N+Pl+Gen: vuáˊroi
    vuáru+v2+N+Pl+Acc: vuáˊroid
    vuáru+v2+N+Pl+Ill: vuáˊroid
    vuáru+v2+N+Pl+Loc: vuáˊroin
    vuáru+v2+N+Pl+Com: vuáˊroiguin
    vuáru+v2+N+Pl+Abe: vuáˊroittáá
